Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF185.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1254YH (2) 91 je/js H.F. 185 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 72.6 Project labor agreements. 1 1. For the purposes of this section: 2 a. âLabor organizationâ means an area or state building 3 and construction trades or crafts council, organization, or 4 association or a comparable body. 5 b. âLarge-scale construction projectâ means the 6 construction, rehabilitation, alteration, conversion, 7 extension, repair, or improvement of a vertical public works 8 project, including a building and other real property-related 9 project, for which the total project cost is twenty-five 10 million dollars or more. 11 c. âProject labor agreementâ means a comprehensive pre-hire 12 collective bargaining agreement that is negotiated between a 13 projectâs owner and an appropriate labor organization and sets 14 out the basic terms and working conditions for that particular 15 project. 16 2. A state agency shall consider using a project labor 17 agreement in connection with a large-scale construction project 18 as provided in this section. 19 3. In awarding a contract in connection with a large-scale 20 construction project, or in obligating funds pursuant to such a 21 contract, a state agency, on a project-by-project basis, may 22 require the use of a project labor agreement when the use will 23 advance the stateâs interest. In making the decision whether 24 to use a project labor agreement, the state agency shall 25 consider the following factors: 26 a. The potential for a labor disruption, such as a strike, 27 lockout, or slowdown, that could affect the timely completion 28 of the project. 29 b. The number of trades and crafts anticipated to be used 30 on the project. 31 c. The need and urgency of the project and the harm to the 32 public if the completion of the project is delayed. 33 d. The size and complexity of the project and the time 34 needed for its completion. 35 -1- LSB 1254YH (2) 91 je/js 1/ 3 H.F. 185 e. The benefits to the public from the use of the project 1 labor agreement relative to the projectâs cost, efficiency, 2 quality, safety, and timeliness of completion. 3 f. The ability to ensure compliance with all applicable 4 state laws and rules governing safety and health, equal 5 employment opportunity, labor, and employment standards. 6 4. If a state agency determines that the use of a project 7 labor agreement will advance the stateâs interest, the state 8 agency may require that every contractor or subcontractor on 9 the project agree, for that project, to negotiate or become a 10 party to a project labor agreement with one or more appropriate 11 labor organizations. The decision to use a project labor 12 agreement shall be supported by written findings by the 13 affected state agency that demonstrate how the use of a project 14 labor agreement will benefit the stateâs interest, particularly 15 with respect to the factors enumerated in subsection 3. 16 5. A project labor agreement reached pursuant to this 17 section shall do all of the following: 18 a. Bind all contractors and subcontractors on the 19 large-scale construction project through the inclusion of 20 appropriate specifications in all relevant solicitation 21 provisions and contract documents. 22 b. Allow all contractors and subcontractors to compete for 23 contracts and subcontracts without regard to whether they are 24 otherwise parties to collective bargaining agreements. 25 c. Contain guarantees against strikes, lockouts, and similar 26 job disruptions. 27 d. Set forth effective, prompt, and mutually binding 28 procedures for resolving labor disputes arising during the term 29 of the project labor agreement. 30 e. Provide other mechanisms for labor-management cooperation 31 on matters of mutual interest and concern, including but not 32 limited to productivity, quality of work, safety, and health. 33 f. Fully conform to all applicable state laws and rules. 34 6. This section shall not be construed to preclude the 35 -2- LSB 1254YH (2) 91 je/js 2/ 3 H.F. 185 use of a project labor agreement on any construction project 1 not otherwise subject to this section. This section shall 2 not be construed to require a contractor or subcontractor to 3 enter into a project labor agreement with any particular labor 4 organization. 5 7. This section applies notwithstanding section 26.16 and 6 chapter 73A, subchapter III. 7